Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.590

Off-street parking space and facilities—Hearing prior to establishment.

Before the establishment of any off-street parking space and/or facilities, the town shall hold a public hearing thereon, prior to the adoption of any ordinance relating to the leasing or acquisition of property, and for the financing thereof for this purpose.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.27.590. Prior: 1961 c 33 s 5.]